windows/es.aff
SFX W   entir intiéremos  entir
SFX W   erir  iriéremos   erir
SFX W   r     éremos      ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiéremos  ertir
SFX W   ervir irviéremos  ervir
SFX W   estir istiéremos  estir
SFX W   r     éremos      eunir
SFX W   etir  itiéremos   etir
SFX W   irir  iriéremos   irir
SFX W   r     éremos      ohibir
SFX W   ír    yéremos     oír
SFX W   orir  uriéremos   orir
SFX W   ormir urmiéremos  ormir
SFX W   cir   jéremos     ducir
SFX W   r     éremos      [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yéremos     [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyéremos    güir
SFX W   ir    éremos      ullir
SFX W   ir    éremos      uñir
SFX W   r     éremos      ehundir
SFX W   erguir irguiéremos erguir
SFX W   ar    uviereis    andar
SFX W   r     reis        [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     reis        [^n]dar
SFX W   r     reis        [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiereis    aber
SFX W   er    iereis      [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciereis    [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iereis      aler
SFX W   er    yereis      caer
SFX W   er    iereis      e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yereis      [eo]er
SFX W   er    iereis      ender
SFX W   ener  uviereis    ener
SFX W   er    iereis      er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiéreis    erer
SFX W   er    iereis      o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiereis    oder
SFX W   er    iereis      olver
SFX W   oner  usiereis    oner
SFX W   er    iereis      or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jereis      raer
SFX W   r     ereis       alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiereis    ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijereis     ecir
SFX W   edir  idiereis    edir
SFX W   egir  igiereis    egir
SFX W   emir  imiereis    emir
SFX W   eguir iguiereis   eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiereis  enchir
SFX W   endir indiereis   endir
SFX W   eír   iereis      eír
SFX W   eñir  iñereis     eñir
SFX W   enir  iniereis    enir
SFX W   entir intiereis   entir
SFX W   erir  iriereis    erir
SFX W   r     ereis       ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiereis   ertir
SFX W   ervir irviereis   ervir
SFX W   estir istiereis   estir
SFX W   etir  itiereis    etir
SFX W   irir  iriereis    irir
SFX W   r     ereis       ohibir
SFX W   ír    yereis      oír
SFX W   orir  uriereis    orir
SFX W   ormir urmiereis   ormir
SFX W   cir   jereis      ducir
SFX W   r     ereis       [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yereis      [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyereis     güir
SFX W   ir    ereis       ullir
SFX W   ir    ereis       uñir
SFX W   r     ereis       ehundir
SFX W   erguir irguiereis  erguir
SFX W   ar    uvieren     andar
SFX W   r     ren         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ren         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ren         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieren     aber
SFX W   er    ieren       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieren     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieren       aler
SFX W   er    yeren       caer
SFX W   er    ieren       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeren       [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieren       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieren     ener
SFX W   er    ieren       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieren     erer
SFX W   er    ieren       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieren     oder
SFX W   er    ieren       olver
SFX W   oner  usieren     oner
SFX W   er    ieren       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeren       raer
SFX W   r     eren        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieren     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeren      ecir
SFX W   edir  idieren     edir
SFX W   egir  igieren     egir
SFX W   emir  imieren     emir
SFX W   eír   ieren       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeren      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieren    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieren   enchir
SFX W   endir indieren    endir
SFX W   enir  inieren     enir
SFX W   entir intieren    entir
SFX W   erir  irieren     erir
SFX W   r     eren        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieren    ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieren    ervir
SFX W   estir istieren    estir
SFX W   r     eren        eunir
SFX W   etir  itieren     etir
SFX W   irir  irieren     irir
SFX W   r     eren        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yeren       oír
SFX W   orir  urieren     orir
SFX W   ormir urmieren    ormir
SFX W   cir   jeren       ducir
SFX W   r     eren        [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yeren       [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyeren      güir
SFX W   ir    eren        ullir
SFX W   ir    eren        uñir
SFX W   r     eren        ehundir
SFX W   erguir irguieren   erguir
SFX W   cer   z           [fh]acer
SFX W   r     d           [aeií]r
SFX W   ener  én          .tener
SFX W   oner  ón          .poner
SFX W   enir  én          .venir
