windows/es.dic
abanar/PSVWX
abastar/OPQRSTVWXrt
abellacar/PSVWX
abominar/HPQSTVWXt
aboyar/PSVWX
absorber/IQTVWXt
acañaverear/PSVWX
academizar/PQSTVWXt
acantalear/PSVWX
acarrar/OPRSVWXr
acedar/PSVWX
achabacanar/IPSVWX
achuchar/PQSTVWXt
acobardar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
acolchar/PSVWX
acoquinar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
acotar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
activar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
acuclillar/OPRSVWXr
adamascar/PSVWX
adentrar/OPRSVWXr
admitir/OQRTVWXrt
adscribir/OQRTVWYrt
adverbializar/PSVWX
afinar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
afogarar/PSVWX
agarrochar/PSVWX
agilizar/HPQSTVWXt
agrisar/OPQRSTVWXrt
agujerar/OPQRSTVWXrt
ahincar/PSVWX
ajar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
alíar/OPRSWX
alargar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
alcantarillar/PQSTVWXt
aleudar/PSVWX
alhajar/PQSTVWXt
alisar/PQSTVWXt
almohadillar/PSVWX
alquitranar/PSVWX
alzaprimar/PSVWX
amalladar/PSVWX
amantar/PSVWX
amartillar/PSVWX
amenizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
amnistiar/PQSTWXt
amordazar/IPQSTVWXt
amostazar/PSVWX
amular/PSVWX
anchar/PSVWX
anihilar/HIPSVWX
antecoger/OQRTUVWXrtu
anudar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
apagar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
aparecer/IORWXo
apayasar/PSVWX
apelmazar/IPQSTVWXt
apesarar/PSVWX
aplastar/ILOPQRSTVWXrt
apomazar/PSVWX
apoyar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
apulgarar/OPRSVWXr
arar/OPQRSTVWXrt
ardalear/PSVWX
aromar/PSVWX
arrapar/PSVWX
arrepanchigar/OPRSVWXr
arrodillar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
arrumbar/PQSTVWXt
aseglarizar/PSVWX
aserruchar/PSVWX
asolapar/PSVWX
astillar/PQSTVWXt
atacar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
atar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
atestiguar/HIPQSTWXt
atizar/PQSTVWXt
atoxicar/OPQRSTVWXrt
atrasar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
atufar/IPSVWX
autenticar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
avecinar/OPQRSTVWXrt
averiguar/HIPQSTWXt
avituallar/IPSVWX
azufrar/IPSVWX
badallar/PSVWX
balbucear/LPSVWX
balsear/PSVWX
barajar/OPQRSTVWXrt
barcinar/PSVWX
barrer/OQRTVWXrt
bastear/PQSTVWXt
bazucar/PSVWX
bermejear/PSVWX
birlar/PQSTVWXt
blanquecer/IQTWXt
bocinar/PSVWX
borbollear/PSVWX
borrachear/PSVWX
bravear/PSVWX
brotar/HPQSTVWXt
burbujear/PSVWX
cañonear/PSVWX
cablear/PQSTVWXt
cachear/PQSTVWXt
calafetear/PQSTVWXt
caldear/IPSVWX
calzar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
campear/PSVWX
cantinflear/PSVWX
capotar/PSVWX
caramelizar/PQSTVWXt
cargar/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
carrozar/PQSTVWXt
castellanizar/PSVWX
catequizar/LPQSTVWXt
cedacear/PSVWX
centralizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
cerrajear/PSVWX
chamarilear/PSVWX
chapucear/PQSTVWXt
charquear/PQSTVWXt
chiclear/PSVWX
chismorrear/PSVWX
chorrear/PSVWX
churrasquear/PSVWX
cinematografiar/PQSTWXt
civilizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
claudicar/HPSVWX
coadunar/HOPRSVWXr
cochear/PSVWX
coincidir/VWX
colegir/WX
combinar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
compadecer/OQRTWXoq
compenetrar/HOPRSVWXr
comprometer/IOQRTVWXrt
concernir/LWX
concursar/LPSVWX
configurar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
confundir/IOQRTVWXrt
conmover/OQRTWXrt
constituir/OQWYoq
contrabatir/VWX
contratar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
copatrocinar/OPQRSTVWXrt
corretear/PSVWX
cotizar/HPSVWX
cromolitografiar/PSWX
cubiletear/PSVWX
cuotear/PQSTVWXt
decalcificar/OPQRSTVWXrt
defenestrar/HPQSTVWXt
delirar/LPSVWX
densificar/OPQRSTVWXrt
derribar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desacompañar/IPSVWX
desagradecer/IQTWXq
desalhajar/PSVWX
desanclar/PQSTVWXt
desaprobar/HPQSTWXt
desasir/IOQRTVWXrt
desavahar/IPSVWX
desbinzar/PSVWX
descalcar/PSVWX
descapitalizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
descastar/PQSTVWXt
desclasificar/HPQSTVWXt
descomprimir/OQRTVWXrt
descordar/PQSTWXt
descristianizar/HPSVWX
desedificar/HPQSTVWXt
desemborrachar/PSVWX
desempatar/PQSTVWXt
desencantar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desendiablar/PSVWX
desenguantar/OPRSVWXr
desensillar/PSVWX
desenvolver/IOQRTUWYrtu
desfamar/PSVWX
desgajar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desguarnir/VWX
deshinchar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desinflamar/PSVWX
deslechuguillar/PSVWX
desmajolar/PSWX
desmenuzar/IPSVWX
desnacionalizar/PQSTVWXt
desoprimir/QTVWXt
despalmar/PSVWX
despedir/IOQWYoq
despezuñar/OPRSVWXr
despoetizar/PSVWX
desquejar/PSVWX
destapar/OPQRSTVWXrt
destornillar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desurcar/PSVWX
desvirtuar/PQSTWXt
devenir/SWY
difumar/PSVWX
diputar/HPSVWX
disecar/HPQSTVWXt
distender/OQRTWXrt
doler/LORWXr
duplicar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
edrar/PSVWX
ejercitar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
embalumar/PSVWX
embastecer/ORWXo
emblandecer/QTWXt
emborrullar/OPRSVWXr
embromar/PSVWX
empajar/PQSTVWXt
emparedar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
emperdigar/PQSTVWXt
emplumar/PQSTVWXt
emputecer/OQRTWXrt
enarcar/PSVWX
encachar/PSVWX
encaminar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
encanutar/PSVWX
encarnar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
encauzar/IPQSTVWXt
enchicar/PSVWX
encobijar/PSVWX
encorecer/QTWXq
encuerar/PSVWX
endulzar/PQSTVWXt
enflaquecer/IOQRTWXoq
enfusir/VWX
engarrotar/PSVWX
engrandecer/IOQRTWXoq
enguijarrar/PSVWX
enjalmar/PSVWX
enlechar/PSVWX
enmadejar/PSVWX
enmordazar/PSVWX
enramblar/PSVWX
enronquecer/IOQRTWXoq
ensartar/PQSTVWXt
ensombrecer/OQRTWXoq
entenebrecer/QTWXq
entrapar/PQSTVWXt
entrenar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
entronizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
envasar/PQSTVWXt
enviudar/PSVWX
erizar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
escacharrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
escandalizar/OPRSVWXr
escarear/OPRSVWXr
escofinar/PSVWX
escrutar/PQSTVWXt
esgarrar/PSVWX
espadañar/PSVWX
esperanzar/PSVWX
espulgar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
estabular/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
esterificar/HPQSTVWXt
estornudar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
estucar/PSVWX
exagerar/HNOPQRSTUVWXrtu
exorcizar/PQSTVWXt
exterminar/HPQSTVWXt
fachear/PSVWX
farandulear/PSVWX
fervorizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
fingir/INOQRTVWXrt
florear/PSVWX
forzar/NOPQRSTUWXrtu
fraternizar/PSVWX
fustigar/HPQSTVWXt
gansear/PSVWX
gastar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
glotonear/PSVWX
grabar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
grillar/NOPRSVWXr
guiar/OPQRSTWXrt
halconear/PSVWX
heder/WX
hermetizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
hiperbolizar/PSVWX
honrar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
humanizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
identificar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
impermeabilizar/HLPQSTVWXt
incardinar/HPSVWX
incumplir/IVWX
infectar/OPQRSTVWXrt
inhalar/HPQSTVWXt
insonorizar/HPQSTVWXt
interactuar/PSWX
intuir/HQWYq
irritar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
jaranear/PSVWX
jonjabar/PSVWX
labrar/LPQSTVWXt
lampacear/PSVWX
latiguear/PSVWX
lematizar/HPQSTVWXt
lijar/PQSTVWXt
llamar/ILOPQRSTUVWXrtu
lubrificar/HLPQSTVWXt
machear/PSVWX
malcomer/VWX
maltraer/QWYq
manear/PSVWX
maquear/PSVWX
maridar/PQSTVWXt
mascullar/PQSTVWXt
maznar/PSVWX
menoscabar/PQSTVWXt
mestizar/PSVWX
milagrear/PSVWX
misar/PSVWX
mojar/OPQRSTVWXrt
montanear/PSVWX
mortificar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
muestrear/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
murmujear/PSVWX
narrar/HPQSTVWXt
nidificar/PSVWX
oír/OQRVWYoq
oficializar/PQSTVWXt
opinar/LPSVWX
orzar/PSVWX
paganizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
palpitar/HLPSVWX
parahusar/PSWX
parvificar/PSVWX
patullar/PSVWX
pelotear/PSVWX
perennizar/PQSTVWXt
perpetuar/HOPQRSTWXrt
petrificar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
pingar/PSVWX
pisonear/PSVWX
plantillar/PSVWX
podrecer/IWX
popar/IPSVWX
potabilizar/PQSTVWXt
predicar/HLPQSTVWXt
preparar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
prevenir/OQWYoq
profetizar/PQSTVWXt
prorratear/PQSTVWXt
pudrir/HIOQRTVW
purificar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
quinolear/PSVWX
radiografiar/PQSTWXt
rasar/LOPRSVWXr
rasurar/HPQSTVWXt
realzar/PQSTVWXt
rebasar/OPQRSTVWXrt
rebuscar/IPQSTVWXt
recargar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
recitar/HPQSTVWXt
reconcomer/ORVWXr
recriminar/HOPRSVWXr
redescubrir/IQTVWYt
reenviar/PQSTWXt
reforzar/IOPQRSTUWXrtu
registrar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
rehumedecer/QTWXq
relabrar/PSVWX
reluchar/PSVWX
remojar/OPQRSTVWXrt
renegrear/PSVWX
repellar/PSVWX
reprimir/OQRTVWXrt
requintar/PSVWX
resfriar/ILOPQRSTWXrt
respirar/HPQSTVWXt
resudar/HPSVWX
retirar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
retrillar/PSVWX
revenir/IWY
rezagar/OPQRSTVWXrt
rodar/ILPQSTWXt
ronzar/PQSTVWXt
ruinar/PSVWX
saborear/IOPQRSTVWXrt
salir/ILORWXo
sanear/IPQSTVWXt
señolear/PSVWX
septuplicar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
silabear/PSVWX
sisar/PQSTVWXt
sobrebarrer/VWX
sobrepintar/OPRSVWXr
socorrer/OQRTVWXrt
solfear/PSVWX
sonetizar/PSVWX
sosañar/PSVWX
subordinar/HLNOPQRSTVWXrt
sufragar/PQSTVWXt
suplantar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
tabellar/PSVWX
tamborilear/PQSTVWXt
tarrascar/PSVWX
telefonear/PQSTVWXt
tentar/HOPQRSTWXrt
timar/OPQRSTVWXrt
titulizar/HPQSTVWXt
torturar/OPQRSTVWXrt
tramar/PSVWX
transliterar/HPQSTVWXt
trascribir/QTVWXYt
trasmitir/QTVWXt
trastrabillar/PSVWX
triar/PQSTWXt
trocear/PQSTVWXt
truncar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
ultimar/HPQSTVWXt
usurar/PSVWX
valorear/PSVWX
vedar/IPQSTVWXt
verdear/PSVWX
viltrotear/PSVWX
vivificar/HLPQSTVWXt
vulnerar/HPQSTVWXt
zangotear/PQSTVWXt
zozobrar/PSVWX
